Utah statutes.
77-32a-4.   Petition for remission of payment of costs.

A defendant who has been sentenced to pay costs and who is not in contumacious default in the payment thereof may at any time petition the court which sentenced him for remission of the payment of costs or of any unpaid portion thereof. If it appears to the satisfaction of the court that payment of the amount due will impose manifest hardship on the defendant or his immediate family, the court may remit all or part of the amount due in costs, or modify the method of payment under Section 77-32a-5.



Enacted by Chapter 15, 1980 General Session

